Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.130.030

Use of transportation fees.

Transportation fees shall be spent only on activities directly related to the institution of higher education's transportation demand management program. These may include, but are not limited to the following activities: Transit, carpool, and vanpool subsidies; ride-sharing programs, and program advertising for carpools, vanpools, and transit service; guaranteed ride-home and telecommuting programs; and bicycle storage facilities. Funds may be spent on capital or operating costs incurred in the implementation of any of these strategies, and may be also used to contract with local or regional transit agencies for transportation services. Funds may be used for existing programs if they are incorporated into the campus transportation demand management program.

[ 1993 c 447 s 4.]